Wisconsin, session 2025, SB759.
do enact as follows:SB759,11Section 1. 138.09 (1c) (a) 3. (intro.) and 4. of the statutes are amended to 2read:SB759,3,43138.09 (1c) (a) 3. (intro.) An Subject to sub. (13) (b), an individual or entity 1who, in connection with a securitization, private placement, collateral financing, or 2other type of investment or financing transaction, lends against or purchases 3consumer loans or any portion of the outstanding balances of consumer loans, if the 4following apply:SB759,3,554. Special Subject to sub. (13) (b), special purpose vehicles.SB759,26Section 2. 138.09 (1g) (a) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:SB759,3,107138.09 (1g) (a) 1. To make a consumer loan that has a finance charge in excess 8of 18 percent per year. A person makes a consumer loan within the meaning of this 9section if the person is named as the lender in the consumer loan agreement or as 10provided in s. 138.09 (13) (b).SB759,311Section 3. 138.09 (3) (f) of the statutes is renumbered 138.09 (3) (f) (intro.) 12and amended to read:SB759,3,1713138.09 (3) (f) (intro.) Each licensee shall make an annual report and submit 14financial statements as provided in s. 224.35 (8). In addition to the information 15required by the division under s. 224.35 (8) (b), the annual report of a licensee that 16made or serviced any loan in the preceding year that was subject to the maximum 17annual percentage rate set forth in sub. (7) (bs) 2. shall include all of the following:SB759,418Section 4. 138.09 (3) (f) 1. to 6. of the statutes are created to read:SB759,3,2119138.09 (3) (f) 1. The number of consumer loans with an annual percentage 20rate in excess of 18 percent that the licensee made or serviced during the preceding 21year.SB759,3,22222. The average annual percentage rate of the loans included in subd. 1.SB759,3,24233. The number of loans included in subd. 1. that were refinanced by the 24licensee during the preceding year.SB759,4,214. The number of loans included in subd. 1. that were secured by a motor 2vehicle that was repossessed during the preceding year.SB759,4,435. The number of loans included in subd. 1. that were accelerated due to 4default during the preceding year.SB759,4,656. The number of loans included in subd. 1. for which a money judgment was 6obtained during the preceding year.SB759,57Section 5. 138.09 (3) (fm) of the statutes is created to read:SB759,4,118138.09 (3) (fm) Notwithstanding s. 220.06 (1m), the division shall submit an 9annual report to the appropriate standing committees of the legislature in the 10manner provided under s. 13.172 (3) summarizing the aggregated data reported by 11licensees under par. (f) 1. to 6.SB759,612Section 6. 138.09 (7) (bp) of the statutes is amended to read:SB759,4,1513138.09 (7) (bp) A consumer loan, whether precomputed or based upon the 14actuarial method, made after October 31, 1984, and before the effective date of this 15paragraph .... [LRB inserts date], is not subject to any maximum interest rate limit.SB759,716Section 7. 138.09 (7) (bs) of the statutes is created to read:SB759,4,2017138.09 (7) (bs) 1. For purposes of this paragraph, “annual percentage rate” 18shall be determined consistent with the provisions of section 107 of the federal 19Truth in Lending Act, 15 USC 1606, and federal Regulation Z adopted under that 20act, 12 CFR 1026.SB759,5,2212. Notwithstanding sub. (9) (a) and ss. 138.05 (8) (c), 422.201 (2) (bn), (9), and 22(10s), and 422.202 (2m) and except as provided in ss. 422.201 (11) and 422.203 (4) 23(c), a licensee may not charge, contract for, or receive an annual percentage rate for 24a consumer loan or forbearance made on or after the effective date of this 1subdivision .... [LRB inserts date], that is greater than 36 percent. This subdivision 2does not apply to a loan subject to regulation under s. 138.10 (2m).SB759,83Section 8. 138.09 (13) of the statutes is created to read:SB759,5,74138.09 (13) (a) No person may engage in any device, subterfuge, or pretense to 5circumvent or evade the requirements of this section, including making a consumer 6loan disguised as a personal property sale and leaseback transaction or disguising 7proceeds of a consumer loan as a cash rebate for a purported sale.SB759,5,108(b) Subject to sub. (3) (cm), a person makes a consumer loan within the 9meaning of this section, regardless of whether the person purports to act as an 10agent, service provider, or in another capacity, if any of the following applies:SB759,5,12111. The person holds, acquires, or maintains, directly or indirectly, the 12predominant economic interest in the consumer loan.SB759,5,15132. The person markets, brokers, arranges, or facilitates the consumer loan 14and holds the right or first right of refusal to purchase the consumer loan or any 15interest in or receivable from the consumer loan.SB759,5,18163. The totality of the circumstances, as applied under par. (c), indicate that 17the person is the lender with respect to the consumer loan and the transaction is 18structured to circumvent or evade the requirements of this section.SB759,5,2019(c) All of the following circumstances weigh in favor of a person being 20considered a lender under par. (b) 3.:SB759,5,22211. That the person indemnifies, insures, or protects a person not subject to 22this section under sub. (1c) (a) from costs or risks related to a consumer loan.SB759,5,24232. That the person predominantly designs, controls, or operates the lending 24program under which the consumer loan is made.SB759,6,313. That the person acts directly as a lender in another state but purports to 2act in this state as an agent or service provider of or in another capacity for a person 3not subject to this section under sub. (1c) (a).SB759,6,644. That the person holds a trademark or service mark or other intellectual 5property right in a licensee’s brand, underwriting system, or other core aspects of 6its lending business with respect to the consumer loan.SB759,97Section 9. 422.201 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:SB759,6,118422.201 (3) For Notwithstanding sub. (2), for licensees under s. 138.09 or 9138.14 or under ss. 218.0101 to 218.0163, the finance charge or annual percentage 10rate, calculated according to those sections, may not exceed the maximums 11permitted in ss. 138.09, 138.14, and 218.0101 to 218.0163, respectively.SB759,1012Section 10. Effective date.SB759,6,1413(1) This act takes effect on the first day of the 3rd month beginning after 14publication.SB759,6,1515